Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-115.6 Disclosure of
personal injury protection limits and payments. Every insurer shall advise
every person entitled to personal injury protection benefits, as defined in
section 431:10C-103.5(a), of the maximum amount of personal injury protection
benefits available under the policy within thirty days of receiving an initial
notice, claim, or application for personal injury protection benefits. The
disclosure of personal injury protection policy limits shall include a
description of the nature of personal injury protection benefits, matters
covered by personal injury protection benefits, and the procedure for
submitting personal injury protection claims. [L 1992, c 123, pt of §1; am L
1997, c 251, §25]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next